Missouri, session 2026, HB3095.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 135.155, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 135.155, to read as follows:
135.155. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, no revenue-
producing enterprise other than headquarters as defined in subsection 10 of section 135.110
shall receive the incentives set forth in sections 135.100 to 135.150 for facilities commencing
operations on or after January 1, 2005. No headquarters shall receive the incentives set forth
in subsections 9 to 14 of section 135.110 for facilities commencing or expanding operations
on or after January 1, [2031] 2041.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 9 of section 135.110 to the contrary, expansions at
headquarters facilities shall each be considered a separate new business facility and each be
entitled to the credits as set forth in subsections 9 to 14 of section 135.110 if the number of
new business facility employees attributed to each such expansion is at least twenty-five and
the amount of new business facility investment attributed to each such expansion is at least
one million dollars. In any year in which a new business facility is not created, the jobs and
investment for that year shall be included in calculating the credits for the most recent new
business facility and not an earlier created new business facility.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3095 2
3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for headquarters, buildings
on multiple noncontiguous real properties shall be considered one facility if the buildings are
located within the same county or within the same municipality.
✔